Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2109
Lessor; prohibited acts.

A lessor shall not:

(1) Charge a penalty for early termination of a consumer rental purchase agreement or for the return of an item at any point except for those charges authorized by section 69-2110;

(2) Require payment by a cosigner of the consumer rental purchase agreement of any fees or charges which could not be imposed upon the consumer as part of the consumer rental purchase agreement;

(3) Require payment of any charges unless specifically authorized by subsection (1) of section 69-2110; or

(4) Increase the lease payment or the total of payments to acquire ownership as a result of a consumer's declining to purchase liability damage waiver.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 641, § 5.